Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-3617
Enforcement of Interstate Medical Licensure Compact; interstate commission; receive service of process.

(a) The executive, legislative, and judicial branches of state government in each member state shall enforce the Interstate Medical Licensure Compact and shall take all actions necessary and appropriate to effectuate the compact’s purposes and intent. The provisions of the compact and the rules promulgated under the compact shall have standing as statutory law but shall not override existing state authority to regulate the practice of medicine.

(b) All courts shall take judicial notice of the compact and the rules in any judicial or administrative proceeding in a member state pertaining to the subject matter of the compact which may affect the powers, responsibilities or actions of the interstate commission.

(c) The interstate commission shall be entitled to receive all service of process in any such proceeding, and shall have standing to intervene in the proceeding for all purposes. Failure to provide service of process to the interstate commission shall render a judgment or order void as to the interstate commission, the compact, or promulgated rules.

Laws 2017, LB88, § 17.